Alabama, session 2026rs, HB489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-33A-1, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§16-33A-1
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires
otherwise, the following terms shall have the following
meanings respectively ascribed to them by this section:
(1) ACHE. The Alabama Commission on Higher Education.
(2) ALABAMA RESIDENT. A person An individual who has
been domiciled in the State of Alabama for a period of at
least 12 consecutive months immediately preceding application
for a grant under the Alabama Student Grant Program program.
The ACHE shall promulgate adopt and enforce regulations rules
further defining and limiting the term domicile so as to limit
the benefits of this legislation chapter to bona fide Alabama
citizens residents, based upon criteria including residency of
parents and guardians, voter registration of students and
parents, driver's driver license registration, and other facts
indicating bona fide citizenship residency.
(3) APPROVED INSTITUTION. a. Includes all of the
following:
1. Any independent nonprofit postsecondary institution
of higher learning located in the State of Alabama which is
accredited by the Commission on Colleges of the Southern
Association of Colleges and Schools, any.
2. Any independent nonprofit postsecondary institution
of higher learning whose credits are accepted by at least
Page 2

of higher learning whose credits are accepted by at least
HB489 INTRODUCED
three other institutions which are accredited by the
Commission on Colleges of the Southern Association of Colleges
and Schools, or any.
3. Any independent postsecondary institution of higher
learning with a permanent facility offering classroom
instruction located in Montgomery County, Alabama, which has
been incorporated and in continuous operation for over 50
years and which has been accredited for over 10 years by the
Commission on Colleges of the Southern Association of Colleges
and Schools, prior to July 1, 2010.
4. Any independent postsecondary online institution
located in Orange Beach, Alabama, that is accredited by the
Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on
Colleges.
b.Such an An approved institution must have an academic
curriculum which is not comprised principally of sectarian
instruction or preparation of students for a sectarian
vocation and which does not award primarily theologian or
seminarian degrees. To the extent that any such institution
may have a religious or denominational affiliation, it the
institution must perform essentially secular educational
functions which are distinct and separable from religious
activity. Such an An approved institution must not
discriminate in its admissions practices on the basis of
religious or denominational preference.
c. No independent postsecondary institution of higher
learning shall be considered an approved institution during
any fiscal year in which it the institution receives a direct
Page 3

any fiscal year in which it the institution receives a direct
HB489 INTRODUCED
appropriation from the State of Alabama. Nothing contained
herein in this subdivision shall be construed to limit,
replace, or diminish any direct state appropriation now being
made or which shall hereafter be made to any independent
institution of higher learning.
(4) ELIGIBLE STUDENT. Any applicant for a grant under
the Alabama Student Grant Program program who:
a. Has obtained a certificate of graduation from a
secondary school or the recognized equivalent of such
graduation; and
b. Is classified as an undergraduate student, as
defined in this chapter; and
c. Is an Alabama resident, as defined in this chapter;
and
d. Is a citizen of the United States or in the process
100 of becoming a citizen of the United States; and
101 e. Is enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a
102 full-time or part-time student in a program of at least six
103 months' duration in an approved institution as defined in this
104 chapter; and
105 f. Is not enrolled and does not intend to enroll in a
106 course of study leading to an undergraduate degree in theology
107 or divinity.
108 (5) FULL-TIME STUDENT. An individual student who meets
109 the criteria established by definitions, and rules, and
110 regulations to be established adopted by the ACHE.
111 (6) GRANT. A monetary award under the Alabama Student
112 Grant Program program to an approved institution on behalf of
Page 4

Grant Program program to an approved institution on behalf of
HB489 INTRODUCED
113 and to the credit of an eligible student pursuant to this
114 chapter.
115 (7) INSTITUTIONAL RELATED EXPENSES. Nonsectarian
116 educational expenses, including, but not limited to, tuition,
117 mandatory fees, room and board, transportation, books and
118 supplies, and other incidental nonsectarian education expenses
119 anticipated by an eligible student.
120 (8) PART-TIME STUDENT. An individual student who meets
121 all qualifications as an eligible student and who meets the
122 further criteria to be established by the ACHE.
123 (9) PROGRAM. The Alabama Student Grant Program,
124 including the administration thereof.
125 (10) UNDERGRADUATE STUDENT. Any individual student who
126 meets all other qualifications as an eligible student and has
127 not received a baccalaureate degree or its equivalent."
128 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
129 1, 2026.
Page 5